Hawaii statutes.
[§46-19.7] Individual shower control valves
required. Every county building code shall require that all showers in new
dwelling units shall be equipped with individual shower control valves of the
pressure balance or the thermostatic mixing valve type unless the temperature
of the water serving the showers is limited to 110 degrees Fahrenheit. The
requirements of this section shall be applicable to building permits issued
after December 31, 1992. [L 1991, c 305, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next